Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
International Racing Hubs

230.775.
Definitions for KRS 230.775 to 230.785.

As used in KRS

230.775

to

230.785

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Hub” means an international wagering hub, a business which, through a qualified subscriber-based service, conducts pari-mutuel wagering on the horse races that it simulcasts and other races that it carries in its wagering menu;

“Qualified subscriber-based service” means any information service or system, including but not limited to a closed-loop system, that uses:

A device or combination of devices authorized and operated exclusively for placing, receiving, or otherwise making pari-mutuel wagers on horse races by a customer subscriber base through accounts established with the operator of the hub;

An effective customer verification and age verification system; and

Appropriate data security standards to prevent unauthorized access by nonsubscribers or minors;

“Foreign jurisdiction” means states other than Kentucky, a territory of the United States, a foreign country, or any political subdivision thereof;

“Racing commission” means the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission or its successor; and

“Call center” means that portion of a qualified subscriber-based service that is physically located in the Commonwealth, where wagers are placed, received, or otherwise made by a customer subscriber base through accounts established with the operator of the hub.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 488, effective July 15, 2010.

230.777.
Applicability of KRS 230.378, 230.379, and 230.380 for residents of Kentucky — Establishment of accounts for out-of-state individuals.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

230.775

to

230.785

, the provisions of KRS

230.378

,

230.379

, and

230.380

shall apply to the establishment of authorized hub accounts for residents of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Accounts may be established for individuals outside of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including foreign jurisdictions, if:

Pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing is lawful in the jurisdiction of the account holder’s principal residence; and

The hub complies with the Interstate Horseracing Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 3001

to 3007. The call center used in the operations of the hub shall not be located on state property.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 12, effective June 25, 2009.

230.779.
Operation of hub — Application for licensure — Requirements — Investigations — Inspections — Administrative regulations — Review and audit.

Notwithstanding KRS 230.361(1), a licensee may operate the hub either independently or in association with one (1) or more racetracks licensed by the racing commission to run live races and conduct pari-mutuel wagering in Kentucky. Hub operations may be physically located on property other than that operated by a racetrack and may accept wagers at that location and shall comply with the Interstate Horseracing Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 3001

to 3007.

As a part of the application for licensure as a hub, an applicant shall submit a detailed plan of operations in a format and containing any information as required by the racing commission. The application shall be accompanied by an application fee to cover incremental costs to the racing commission, in an amount the racing commission determines to be appropriate. At a minimum, the operating plan shall address the following:

The manner in which the proposed wagering system will operate, including its proposed operating schedule;

The requirements for a qualified subscriber-based service set out in KRS

230.775

; and

The requirements for accounts established and operated for persons whose principal residence is outside of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The racing commission may require changes in a proposed plan of operations as a condition of licensure. Subsequent material changes in the system’s operation shall not occur unless approved by the racing commission.

The racing commission may conduct investigations or inspections or request additional information from any applicant as it deems appropriate in determining whether to approve the license application.

An applicant licensed under this section may enter into any agreements that are necessary to promote, advertise, and further the sport of horse racing, or for the effective operation of hub operations, including, without limitation, interstate account wagering, television production, and telecommunications services.

The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations to effectuate the provisions of KRS

230.775

to

230.785

. The administrative regulations shall include but not be limited to criteria for licensing, the application process, the format for the plan of operations, requisite fees, procedures for notifying the racing commission of substantive changes, contents of agreements entered into under subsection (5) of this section, procedures for accounting for wagers made, and other matters reasonably necessary to implement KRS

230.775

to

230.785

.

The racing commission may require the hub to make the following payments to the racing commission:

A license fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) per operating day; and

A fee of not more than one percent (1%) of the hub’s total gross wagering receipts.

A hub’s records and financial information shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

The Auditor of Public Accounts may review and audit all records and financial information of the hub, including all account information. The Auditor shall prepare a report of the review and audit which shall not contain any proprietary information regarding the hub. A copy of the report shall be sent to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 489, effective July 15, 2010.

230.781.
Fees and taxes.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 230.779(7), the operator of a hub shall not be subject to any fee or tax imposed on racetracks or simulcast facilities under KRS

137.170

,

138.510

, or Chapter 230 for the hub operator’s wagering and simulcast operations established under KRS

230.775

to

230.785

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2022 ch. 124, § 24, effective July 14, 2022.

230.783.
Wagers considered made in Kentucky — Prohibited wagers — Revocation of hub license — Applicability of KRS 137.170, 138.510, and Chapter 230.

Any wager that is made for an account maintained with the hub operator shall be considered to have been made in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Account holders may communicate instructions concerning account wagers to the hub only by telephonic or other electronic means.

None of the following wagers shall be processed through a hub:

A wager on live racing accepted by a track;

A telephone account wager accepted by a track;

An intertrack wager accepted by a receiving track or simulcast facility; or

An interstate wager accepted by a receiving track or simulcast facility.

Any hub that processes any of the wagers delineated in subsection (3) of this section from a track, receiving track, or simulcast facility shall be subject to revocation of its hub license.

Except as provided in KRS

230.752

, nothing in KRS

230.775

to

230.785

shall exempt racetracks or simulcast facilities from any taxes imposed under KRS

137.170

,

138.510

, or Chapter 230.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2022 ch. 124, § 25, effective July 14, 2022.

230.785.
Access for review and audit of hub operator — Audited financial statements.

The racing commission or its staff shall, upon request, be given access, for review and audit, to all records and financial information of the hub operator, including all account information. The racing commission may require that the hub operator annually submit to the racing commission audited financial statements.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 173, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 490, effective July 15, 2010.

230.800.
Kentucky Thoroughbred breeders incentive fund — Creation — Funding sources — Administrative regulations — Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to administer fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a trust and revolving fund designated as the “Kentucky Thoroughbred breeders incentive fund.” The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission. For all tax periods beginning on or after June 1, 2005, eighty percent (80%) of all receipts collected under KRS 139.531(1)(a) from the sales and use tax on the fees paid for breeding a stallion to a mare in Kentucky shall be deposited in the fund together with any other money contributed, appropriated, or allocated to the fund from all other sources. The money deposited in the fund is hereby appropriated for the uses set forth in this section. Any money remaining in the fund at the close of any calendar year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next calendar year. The fund may also receive additional state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds. All interest earned on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use moneys deposited in the Kentucky Thoroughbred breeders incentive fund to administer the fund and provide rewards for breeders of horses bred and foaled in Kentucky.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the conditions and criteria for the distribution of moneys from the fund.

The Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations establishing the procedures necessary to determine the correct allocation of sales tax receipts described in subsection (1) of this section.

As soon as practicable after the close of each calendar year, the racing commission shall disburse to breeders of horses moneys in the Kentucky Thoroughbred breeders incentive fund pursuant to the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 133, effective June 1, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 491, effective July 15, 2010.

230.802.
Kentucky standardbred breeders incentive fund — Creation — Funding sources — Administrative regulations — Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to administer fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a trust and revolving fund designated as the “Kentucky standardbred breeders incentive fund.” The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission. For tax periods beginning on or after June 1, 2005, thirteen percent (13%) of all receipts collected under KRS 139.531(1)(a) from the sales and use tax on the fees paid for breeding a stallion to a mare in Kentucky shall be deposited in the fund together with any other money contributed, appropriated, or allocated to the fund from all other sources. The money deposited in the fund is hereby appropriated for the uses set forth in this section. Any money remaining in the fund at the close of any calendar year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next calendar year. The fund may also receive additional state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds. All interest earned on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use moneys deposited in the Kentucky standardbred breeders incentive fund to administer the fund and provide rewards for breeders or owners of Kentucky-bred standardbred horses.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the conditions and criteria for the distribution of moneys from the fund.

The Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations establishing the procedures necessary to determine the correct allocation of sales tax receipts described in subsection (1) of this section.

As soon as practicable after the close of each calendar year, the racing commission shall disburse moneys in the Kentucky standardbred breeders incentive fund to be used to promote, enhance, improve, and encourage the further and continued development of the standardbred breeding industry in Kentucky, under the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 134, effective June 1, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 492, effective July 15, 2010.

230.804.
Kentucky horse breeders incentive fund — Funding sources — Distribution of moneys — Administrative regulations — Kentucky Horse Racing Commission to administer fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a trust and revolving fund designated as the “Kentucky horse breeders incentive fund.” The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission. For tax periods beginning on or after June 1, 2005, seven percent (7%) of all receipts collected under KRS 139.531(1)(a) from the sales and use tax on the fees paid for breeding a stallion to a mare in Kentucky shall be deposited in the fund together with any other money contributed, appropriated or allocated to the fund from all other sources. The money deposited in the fund is hereby appropriated for the uses set forth in this section. Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any money remaining in the fund at the close of any calendar year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next calendar year. The fund may also receive additional state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds. All interest earned on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall use moneys deposited in the Kentucky horse breeders incentive fund to administer the fund and provide rewards for breeders or owners of horses bred and foaled in Kentucky.

The Kentucky Horse Racing Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the conditions and criteria for the distribution of moneys from the fund.

The Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations establishing the procedures necessary to determine the correct allocation of sales tax receipts described in subsection (1) of this section.

As soon as practicable after the close of each calendar year, the racing commission shall disburse to breeders of horses moneys in the Kentucky horse breeders incentive fund to be used to promote, enhance, improve, and encourage the further and continued development of the horse industry in Kentucky, under the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 135, effective June 1, 2005; 2006, ch. 234, § 2, effective April 22, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 493, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 47, § 4, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/22/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 234, sec. 4, provides that the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known as the “2006 Kentucky Equine Competitiveness Act.”